uz-hunspell-master/uz-lat.aff
SFX A Y 1075
SFX A 0 li/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 dek/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 day/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 simon/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 sifat/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 cha .
SFX A 0 roq/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 gacha/IJKLMN .
SFX A 0 -yu [aeiou]
SFX A 0 -ya [aeiou]
SFX A 0 yoq [aeiou]
SFX A 0 u [^aeiou]
SFX A 0 -a [^aeiou]
SFX A 0 dagina .
SFX A 0 dangina .
SFX A 0 nigina .
SFX A 0 largina .
SFX A 0 lardagina .
SFX A 0 lardangina .
SFX A 0 larnigina .
SFX A 0 gina [^kq]
SFX A 0 kina [k]
SFX A 0 laru .
SFX A 0 lar-a .
SFX A 0 larin .
SFX A 0 ligi .
SFX A 0 ligimi .
SFX A 0 ligi-da .
SFX A 0 ligi-ku .
SFX A 0 ligi-chi .
SFX A 0 ligidir .
SFX A 0 ligidan .
SFX A 0 ligidanmi .
SFX A 0 ligidan-da .
SFX A 0 ligidan-ku .
SFX A 0 ligidan-chi .
SFX A 0 ligidandir .
SFX A 0 ligiga .
SFX A 0 ligigami .
SFX A 0 ligiga-da .
SFX A 0 ligiga-ku .
SFX A 0 ligiga-chi .
SFX A 0 ligigadir .
SFX A 0 ligida .
SFX A 0 ligidami .
SFX A 0 ligida-da .
SFX A 0 ligida-ku .
SFX A 0 ligida-chi .
SFX A 0 ligidadir .
SFX A 0 ligini .
SFX A 0 liginimi .
SFX A 0 ligini-da .
SFX A 0 ligini-ku .
SFX A 0 ligini-chi .
SFX A 0 liginidir .
SFX A 0 ligim .
SFX A 0 ligimmi .
SFX A 0 ligim-da .
SFX A 0 ligim-ku .
SFX A 0 ligim-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimdir .
SFX A 0 ligimdan .
SFX A 0 ligimdanmi .
SFX A 0 ligimdan-da .
SFX A 0 ligimdan-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimdan-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimdandir .
SFX A 0 ligimga .
SFX A 0 ligimgami .
SFX A 0 ligimga-da .
SFX A 0 ligimga-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimga-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimgadir .
SFX A 0 ligimda .
SFX A 0 ligimdami .
SFX A 0 ligimda-da .
SFX A 0 ligimda-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimda-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimdadir .
SFX A 0 ligimni .
SFX A 0 ligimnimi .
SFX A 0 ligimni-da .
SFX A 0 ligimni-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimni-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimnidir .
SFX A 0 liging .
SFX A 0 ligingmi .
SFX A 0 liging-da .
SFX A 0 liging-ku .
SFX A 0 liging-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingdir .
SFX A 0 ligingdan .
SFX A 0 ligingdanmi .
SFX A 0 ligingdan-da .
SFX A 0 ligingdan-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingdan-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingdandir .
SFX A 0 ligingga .
SFX A 0 liginggami .
SFX A 0 ligingga-da .
SFX A 0 ligingga-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingga-chi .
SFX A 0 liginggadir .
SFX A 0 ligingda .
SFX A 0 ligingdami .
SFX A 0 ligingda-da .
SFX A 0 ligingda-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingda-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingdadir .
SFX A 0 ligingni .
SFX A 0 ligingnimi .
SFX A 0 ligingni-da .
SFX A 0 ligingni-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingni-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingnidir .
SFX A 0 ligimiz .
SFX A 0 ligimizmi .
SFX A 0 ligimiz-da .
SFX A 0 ligimiz-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimiz-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimizdir .
SFX A 0 ligimizdan .
SFX A 0 ligimizdanmi .
SFX A 0 ligimizdan-da .
SFX A 0 ligimizdan-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimizdan-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimizdandir .
SFX A 0 ligimizga .
SFX A 0 ligimizgami .
SFX A 0 ligimizga-da .
SFX A 0 ligimizga-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimizga-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimizgadir .
SFX A 0 ligimizda .
SFX A 0 ligimizdami .
SFX A 0 ligimizda-da .
SFX A 0 ligimizda-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimizda-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimizdadir .
SFX A 0 ligimizni .
SFX A 0 ligimiznimi .
SFX A 0 ligimizni-da .
SFX A 0 ligimizni-ku .
SFX A 0 ligimizni-chi .
SFX A 0 ligimiznidir .
SFX A 0 ligingiz .
SFX A 0 ligingizmi .
SFX A 0 ligingiz-da .
SFX A 0 ligingiz-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingiz-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingizdir .
SFX A 0 ligingizdan .
SFX A 0 ligingizdanmi .
SFX A 0 ligingizdan-da .
SFX A 0 ligingizdan-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingizdan-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingizdandir .
SFX A 0 ligingizga .
SFX A 0 ligingizgami .
SFX A 0 ligingizga-da .
SFX A 0 ligingizga-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingizga-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingizgadir .
SFX A 0 ligingizda .
SFX A 0 ligingizdami .
SFX A 0 ligingizda-da .
SFX A 0 ligingizda-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingizda-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingizdadir .
SFX A 0 ligingizni .
SFX A 0 ligingiznimi .
SFX A 0 ligingizni-da .
SFX A 0 ligingizni-ku .
SFX A 0 ligingizni-chi .
SFX A 0 ligingiznidir .
SFX A 0 simonligi .
SFX A 0 simonligimi .
SFX A 0 simonligi-da .
SFX A 0 simonligi-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligi-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligidir .
SFX A 0 simonligidan .
SFX A 0 simonligidanmi .
SFX A 0 simonligidan-da .
SFX A 0 simonligidan-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligidan-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligidandir .
SFX A 0 simonligiga .
SFX A 0 simonligigami .
SFX A 0 simonligiga-da .
SFX A 0 simonligiga-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligiga-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligigadir .
SFX A 0 simonligida .
SFX A 0 simonligidami .
SFX A 0 simonligida-da .
SFX A 0 simonligida-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligida-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligidadir .
SFX A 0 simonligini .
SFX A 0 simonliginimi .
SFX A 0 simonligini-da .
SFX A 0 simonligini-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligini-chi .
SFX A 0 simonliginidir .
SFX A 0 simonligim .
SFX A 0 simonligimmi .
SFX A 0 simonligim-da .
SFX A 0 simonligim-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligim-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimdir .
SFX A 0 simonligimdan .
SFX A 0 simonligimdanmi .
SFX A 0 simonligimdan-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimdan-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimdan-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimdandir .
SFX A 0 simonligimga .
SFX A 0 simonligimgami .
SFX A 0 simonligimga-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimga-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimga-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimgadir .
SFX A 0 simonligimda .
SFX A 0 simonligimdami .
SFX A 0 simonligimda-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimda-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimda-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimdadir .
SFX A 0 simonligimni .
SFX A 0 simonligimnimi .
SFX A 0 simonligimni-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimni-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimni-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimnidir .
SFX A 0 simonliging .
SFX A 0 simonligingmi .
SFX A 0 simonliging-da .
SFX A 0 simonliging-ku .
SFX A 0 simonliging-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingdir .
SFX A 0 simonligingdan .
SFX A 0 simonligingdanmi .
SFX A 0 simonligingdan-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingdan-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingdan-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingdandir .
SFX A 0 simonligingga .
SFX A 0 simonliginggami .
SFX A 0 simonligingga-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingga-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingga-chi .
SFX A 0 simonliginggadir .
SFX A 0 simonligingda .
SFX A 0 simonligingdami .
SFX A 0 simonligingda-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingda-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingda-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingdadir .
SFX A 0 simonligingni .
SFX A 0 simonligingnimi .
SFX A 0 simonligingni-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingni-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingni-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingnidir .
SFX A 0 simonligimiz .
SFX A 0 simonligimizmi .
SFX A 0 simonligimiz-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimiz-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimiz-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdir .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdan .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdanmi .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdan-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdan-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdan-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdandir .
SFX A 0 simonligimizga .
SFX A 0 simonligimizgami .
SFX A 0 simonligimizga-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimizga-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimizga-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimizgadir .
SFX A 0 simonligimizda .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdami .
SFX A 0 simonligimizda-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimizda-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimizda-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimizdadir .
SFX A 0 simonligimizni .
SFX A 0 simonligimiznimi .
SFX A 0 simonligimizni-da .
SFX A 0 simonligimizni-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligimizni-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligimiznidir .
SFX A 0 simonligingiz .
SFX A 0 simonligingizmi .
SFX A 0 simonligingiz-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingiz-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingiz-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdir .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdan .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdanmi .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdan-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdan-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdan-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdandir .
SFX A 0 simonligingizga .
SFX A 0 simonligingizgami .
SFX A 0 simonligingizga-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingizga-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingizga-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingizgadir .
SFX A 0 simonligingizda .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdami .
SFX A 0 simonligingizda-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingizda-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingizda-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingizdadir .
SFX A 0 simonligingizni .
SFX A 0 simonligingiznimi .
SFX A 0 simonligingizni-da .
SFX A 0 simonligingizni-ku .
SFX A 0 simonligingizni-chi .
SFX A 0 simonligingiznidir .
SFX A 0 chaligi .
SFX A 0 chaligimi .
SFX A 0 chaligi-da .
SFX A 0 chaligi-ku .
SFX A 0 chaligi-chi .
SFX A 0 chaligidir .
SFX A 0 chaligidan .
SFX A 0 chaligidanmi .
SFX A 0 chaligidan-da .
SFX A 0 chaligidan-ku .
SFX A 0 chaligidan-chi .
SFX A 0 chaligidandir .
SFX A 0 chaligiga .
SFX A 0 chaligigami .
SFX A 0 chaligiga-da .
SFX A 0 chaligiga-ku .
